California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(d) A record of purchase shall be made by the agent on a master purchase order. Each purchasing retailer shall furnish the designated agent with a signed order setting forth such licensee’s purchase, to be attached to and become a part of the master order. Master and individual orders shall be maintained in compliance with Section 25752 and fiscal liability shall extend in so far as the amount of the purchase designated and delivered for each individual retailer of the purchasing group is subject to the provisions of Section 25509.

(e) The merchandise shall be deemed to have been received by each retailer member of the purchasing group when delivered to the designated premises.

(f) When a group buying member has not made payment in full by the expiration of the 30th day from date of delivery or has not paid the one percent charge at the expiration of the 30th day from the date the charge became due, such group buying member shall be expelled from the buying group and prohibited from rejoining that group or joining any other such group until such time that all payments have been received for the merchandise sold and delivered to such retailer more than 30 days previously.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1194, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Beer Price Posting and Marketing Regulations [25000. - 25010.]

25000.

(a) Each manufacturer, importer, and wholesaler of beer shall file and thereafter maintain on file with the department, in such form as the department may provide, a written schedule of selling prices charged by the licensee for beer sold and distributed by the licensee to customers in California, except that the transfer, including the sale, of beer between wholesalers who sell the same brand in package is permitted without filing the schedule of selling prices, and the transfer, including the sale, of beer made under contract from a contract beer manufacturer making the beer to a beer manufacturer receiving the beer is permitted without filing the schedule of selling prices. All prices filed shall be for immediate delivery. Each manufacturer, importer, and wholesaler of beer shall file a price schedule for each county in which his or her customers have their premises, whether the price that is posted is f.o.b. or delivered, or both. Different prices for different trading areas within a county shall be based upon natural geographical differences justifying the different prices, and shall not be established for special customers. This section shall not affect or alter any provisions of law concerning quantity discounts on beer.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “contract beer manufacturer” is a beer manufacturer that does all of the following:

(1) Makes beer pursuant to a written contract with another beer manufacturer, and neither entity has a controlling interest in the other entity.

(2) Makes beer in accordance with a recipe that is a trade secret of the beer manufacturer having its beer made under contract.

(3) Has no right to sell the beer to any other beer manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler other than the beer manufacturer who contracted for the beer.

(c) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   Effective October 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.2.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Acquire” means to purchase, receive, assume, obtain, or otherwise come into possession or control of.

(2) “Affected distribution rights” means the distribution rights to the product held by the existing beer wholesaler prior to the acquisition of the right to manufacture, import, or distribute the product by the successor beer manufacturer.

(3) “Beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate,
 or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(4) “Cancel” means to terminate, reduce, not renew, not appoint or reappoint, or cause any of the same.

(5) “Existing beer wholesaler” means a beer wholesaler that distributes a product at the time a
 successor beer manufacturer acquires the rights to manufacture, import, or distribute that product.

(6) “Fair market value” includes all elements of value, including, but not limited to, goodwill.

(7) “Product” means a brand or brands of beer, as defined by Section
 23006.

(8) “Successor beer manufacturer” means a beer manufacturer or any person as defined by Section 23008, whether licensed or unlicensed, who acquires the
 rights to manufacture, import, or distribute a product.

(9) “Successor beer manufacturer’s designee” means one or more distributors designated by the successor beer manufacturer to replace the existing beer wholesaler, for all or part of the existing beer wholesaler’s territory, in the distribution of the product.

(b) (1) Any successor beer manufacturer that acquires the rights to manufacture, import, or distribute a product, and
 who cancels any of the existing beer wholesaler’s rights to distribute the product, shall comply with this section.

(2) A successor beer manufacturer’s designee shall comply with this section.

(c) (1) The successor beer manufacturer shall notify the existing beer wholesaler of the successor beer manufacturer’s intent to cancel any of the existing beer wholesaler’s rights to distribute the product.

(2) The successor beer manufacturer shall mail the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the existing beer wholesaler. The successor beer manufacturer shall include in the notice the name, address, and telephone number of the successor beer manufacturer’s designee
 or designees.

(d) The successor beer manufacturer’s designee shall negotiate with the existing beer wholesaler to determine the fair market value of the affected distribution rights and, if the existing beer wholesaler and the successor beer manufacturer’s designee agree to the fair market value of the affected distribution rights, shall compensate the existing beer wholesaler in the agreed amount. The successor beer manufacturer’s designee and the existing beer wholesaler shall negotiate in good faith.

(e) The existing beer wholesaler shall continue to distribute the product to at least the same extent that it distributed the product immediately before the successor beer manufacturer acquired rights to the product until receipt of the payment of the compensation agreed to under
 subdivision (d) is made or is awarded under subdivision (f). The successor beer manufacturer and the existing beer wholesaler shall act in good faith regarding the ongoing supply and distribution of the product.

(f) If the successor beer manufacturer’s designee and the existing beer wholesaler are unable to mutually agree on the fair market value of the affected distribution rights within 30 days of the existing beer wholesaler’s receipt of the successor beer manufacturer’s notice pursuant to subdivision (c), the successor beer manufacturer’s designee or the existing beer wholesaler shall initiate arbitration against each other to determine the issue of compensation for the fair market value of the affected distribution rights no later than 40 days after the existing beer wholesaler’s receipt of the successor beer manufacturer’s notice pursuant
 to subdivision (c). Upon submission to arbitration, the arbitration shall be the means of determining compensation to the existing beer wholesaler for the fair market value of the affected distribution rights, and the fair market value of the affected distribution rights shall be the purpose of the arbitration unless the parties agree otherwise.

(1) An arbitration held under this subdivision shall be held in California through a private arbitration services provider with at least three offices in California and a statewide roster of at least 70 neutral arbitrators, of which at least 30 have prior experience as a sole arbitrator in franchise, distribution, or related business litigation.

(2) The direct costs of the arbitration, including any fees charged by the
 arbitrator, shall be borne equally by the parties engaged in the arbitration. All other costs shall be paid by the party incurring them.

(3) The parties shall mutually agree on an arbitrator. If the parties cannot agree on the arbitrator, the arbitration provider shall select an impartial arbitrator.

(4) (A) No later than 20 days after receipt of a notification to arbitrate, the parties shall complete an initial exchange of all nonprivileged documents and other information relevant to the fair market value of the affected distribution rights in their possession and control, including, without limitation, copies of all documents and the names of individuals who may be called to testify at the arbitration hearing. No later than 45 days after receipt of
 notification to arbitrate, the parties shall complete an exchange of the names of any experts who may be called to testify at the arbitration hearing, together with each expert’s report that may be introduced at the arbitration hearing.

(B) The arbitrator may modify the requirements of subparagraph (A) on a showing of good cause. The arbitrator shall permit third-party discovery and additional discovery between beer wholesalers, including depositions, which the arbitrator finds appropriate for a period of time not to exceed 90 days after receipt of a notification to arbitrate. No discovery shall be permitted against a beer manufacturer.

(5) The decision of the arbitrator shall be final and binding on the parties unless notice of appeal is filed, within 10 business days after
 service of the arbitration award, with the superior court of the county in which the hearing was held. Upon filing of the appeal, the court shall review the arbitration award for errors of fact or law by determining whether the award is supported by the sufficiency of the evidence presented at the arbitration. This subdivision shall further permit any other appeal or review that is authorized by the California Arbitration Act (Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure).

(6) The arbitrator’s award shall be monetary only and shall not enjoin or compel conduct.

(7) The arbitration hearing shall conclude not more than 180 days after receipt of a notification to arbitrate, unless the time period is extended by mutual agreement of the parties or by the arbitrator.

(8) The arbitrator shall render a decision not later than 15 days after the conclusion of the arbitration unless this time period is extended by mutual agreement of the parties or by the arbitrator.

(9) A party who fails to participate in the arbitration hearings waives all rights the party would have had in the arbitration and is considered to have consented to the determination of the arbitrator.

(10) The Legislature finds and declares that several unique factors in combination warrant the Legislature authorizing limited mandatory arbitration between an existing beer wholesaler and a successor beer manufacturer’s designee solely to determine the issue of compensation for the fair market value of the affected distribution
 rights:

(A) On the issue of the fair market value of the affected distribution rights, the parties are sophisticated and in an equal position in their knowledge of this legal issue and understand the law and their legal rights, including their jury trial rights.

(B) The parties desire a mandatory arbitration provision to resolve the question of compensation for the fair market value of the affected distribution rights if the parties are not able to reach a mutual settlement so that product distribution can be continued in an orderly manner and the determination of compensation can be made in a timely manner.

(C) The state’s regulatory interest in maintaining orderly markets for the safe and efficient transportation,
 distribution, and sale of beer within the state warrants the statutory authorization for mandatory arbitration as provided in this section.

(g) If the existing beer wholesaler does not receive payment of the compensation under subdivision (d) or (f) not later than 10 business days after the date of the settlement or service of the arbitration award, and if there is no appeal or review filed under paragraph (5) of subdivision (f), the existing beer wholesaler shall remain the distributor of the product in the existing beer wholesaler’s territory to at least the same extent that the existing beer wholesaler distributed the product immediately before the successor beer manufacturer acquired rights to the product, and the existing beer wholesaler is not entitled to the settlement or arbitration award.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit good faith settlements voluntarily entered into by the parties subsequent to the successor beer manufacturer’s notice pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   (AB 344)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.5.

(a) Every beer manufacturer, whether located within or without the state, who sells and distributes beer in this state shall designate territorial limits in the state within which the brands of beer manufactured by him may be sold by wholesalers of beer to customers.

(b) A wholesaler of beer shall not sell any brand of beer unless the following conditions are met:

(1) The wholesaler has first entered into a written agreement, with the manufacturer of that brand, which sets forth the territorial limits within which the brand shall be distributed by the wholesaler.

(2) A copy of the agreement, and any amendments thereto, has been filed with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.6.

(a) A provision in an agreement between a beer manufacturer and a beer wholesaler for the sale and distribution of beer in this state, which restricts venue to a forum outside this state, is void with respect to any claim arising under or relating to the agreement involving a beer wholesaler operating within this state.

(b) This section shall apply to any transaction or conduct pursuant to an agreement described in subdivision (a) on or after the effective date of this section.

(c) For purposes of the section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 567, Sec. 4.   Effective October 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.7.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any agreement for the sale or distribution of beer between a beer manufacturer and beer wholesaler, no sale or distribution agreement shall be terminated solely for a beer wholesaler’s failure to meet a sales goal or quota that is not commercially reasonable under the prevailing market conditions.

(b) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1083, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.9.

(a) Any beer manufacturer who unreasonably withholds consent or unreasonably denies approval of a sale, transfer, or assignment of any ownership interest in a beer wholesaler’s business with respect to that manufacturer’s brand or brands, shall be liable in damages to the beer wholesaler. Recoverable damages under this section shall not exceed the compensatory damages sustained by the wholesaler and the wholesaler’s costs of suit. The fair market value of the beer wholesaler’s business shall include, but is not limited to, its goodwill, if any.

(b) If a beer wholesaler has been paid a consideration by a successor wholesaler for the sale, transfer, or assignment of the beer wholesaler’s interest in the sale or distribution of the affected brand or brands, the beer manufacturer shall be liable only for compensatory damages in an amount reflecting the difference in the amount already paid to the beer wholesaler, and the fair market value of the beer wholesaler’s business with respect to the affected brand or brands.

(c) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1083, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25001.

The schedule of prices filed may be changed or modified from time to time by the licensee filing it by filing with the department either a new and complete schedule of prices or an amendment thereto of changed or modified prices, as the department may by rule require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25002.

The first schedule of prices filed by a licensee shall be effective immediately upon filing, but an amendatory schedule or amendments to a prior filed schedule is not effective until ten (10) days after the filing date thereof, except that if any licensee has filed a new schedule or amendments to a prior filed schedule to meet lower posted and filed competing prices in a trade area, and the prices thus posted are not lower than the competing prices sought to be met, the new schedule or amendments shall go into effect immediately if the competing prices are already effective, or at the same time as the competing prices become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25003.

Filed price schedules are subject to public inspection only after they take effect. Each filing licensee shall retain in the licensed premises a copy of his or her effective posted and filed schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.

Upon the filing of an original schedule of prices and after the effective date of any schedule of amendatory prices, all prices therein stated shall be strictly adhered to by the filing licensee, and any departure or variance therefrom by a licensee is a misdemeanor, except that the transfer of beer between wholesalers who sell the same brand in package is permitted without filing the schedule of selling prices. Each sale or transaction involving a violation of posted prices under this chapter is but a single offense or violation of this chapter regardless of the number of articles covered by the sale or transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of any licensee who knowingly assists or aids in the violation of this chapter or any effective posted price or any rule of the department passed to carry out the provisions of this chapter is guilty of the violation equally with the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25006.

The department may adopt such rules, including but not limited to rules respecting beer price posting, as will foster and encourage the orderly wholesale marketing and wholesale distribution of beer, but no such action shall be taken by the department except after public hearing and ten (10) days notice to all licensed manufacturers of beer in California of the time and place of the hearing and of the character of the action intended to be taken by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25007.

Except as provided in Section 25000.5, no manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler mentioned in this chapter is prohibited the right of choice of customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------

25008.

(a) Any trade association having as members licensed beer manufacturers or licensed beer wholesalers representing more than half of the volume of beer sold in California for three months prior to the date of a filing of any suit authorized in this chapter may maintain an action to enjoin a continuance of any act or acts in violation of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant thereto and, if injured thereby, for the recovery of damages. If in the action the court finds the defendant is violating or has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant thereto, the court shall enjoin the defendant from a continuance or further violation thereof. It shall not be necessary that actual damages to the plaintiff be alleged or proved in the action, and proof of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant thereto shall be presumptive evidence of an intention to continue to violate this chapter or any such rule.

(b) Any trade association having as members licensed beer manufacturers or licensed beer wholesalers representing more than half of the volume of beer sold in California for three months prior to the date of a filing of a petition to intervene shall, upon the filing of the petition, be permitted to intervene as a party in any proceeding, whether before the department, any other administrative agency, or any court, which involves, in whole or part, the validity of any portion of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act or of any rule adopted pursuant thereto. Intervention shall be permitted, upon petition, at any time before a final determination or adjudication has been rendered in the proceeding. In the case of an adjudicatory proceeding, an intervening trade association shall have the same right to participate in discovery and trial as any other party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   Effective May 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

25009.

Any defendant in any action brought under this chapter or any person who may be a witness therein under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 776 of the Evidence Code, and the books and records of the defendant or witness, may be brought into court and the books and records may be introduced by reference into evidence, but no information so obtained may be used against the defendant or the witness as a basis for a misdemeanor prosecution under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

25010.

The department shall not suspend or revoke the license of any licensee for a violation of the provisions of this chapter or a rule adopted pursuant thereto unless he has committed, within a period of one year, at least three separate violations of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule adopted pursuant thereto, and the violations have been proved by any of the following methods:

(a) A conviction for misdemeanor.

(b) A judgment in a civil suit for injunction as provided in this chapter.

(c) A finding of the department, if a hearing is held in accordance with Chapters 7 and 8 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Labels and Containers [25170. - 25248.]



  ARTICLE 1. Distilled Spirits [25170. - 25179.]

25170.

Any person who delivers to the premises of any on- or off-sale general licensee, or any on- or off-sale general licensee who has upon his licensed premises, or any person who possesses any distilled spirits the container of which does not bear a label plainly indicating the quantity and proof strength of the contents and the name of the manufacturer, rectifier, importer, or wholesaler thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor. To the extent that such information is blown into the glass of the container, it constitutes a compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25171.

Any rectifier or wholesaler of distilled spirits who delivers to the premises of any on- or off-sale general licensee or any on- or off-sale general licensee who sells or has in his possession at the licensed premises distilled spirits in packages containing standards of fill for distilled spirits which do not conform in all respects to the federal standards established pursuant to the regulations issued under the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. Secs. 201 et seq.) and any amendments thereto is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25171.1.

The provisions of Section 25171 shall not apply to any sightseeing, tourist or charter vessels holding on-sale general licenses for boats and regularly operated for the convenience of the general public and which have a capacity of carrying 100 or more passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 647.)
-------------------------------------------

25172.

Any unlicensed person or any on- or off-sale general licensee who has in his possession any distilled spirits in packages or containers larger than one gallon is guilty of a misdemeanor, unless the distilled spirits have been sold and delivered to the person or licensee by the holder of an industrial alcohol dealer's, distilled spirits manufacturer's, brandy manufacturer's, or rectifier’s license for use in the trades, professions, or industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25173.

Any industrial alcohol dealer, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, brandy manufacturer, or rectifier who delivers undenatured ethyl alcohol or other distilled spirits in packages of more than one gallon for use in the trades, professions, or industries is guilty of a misdemeanor, unless the packages bear a label plainly stating the true and correct name and address of the industrial alcohol dealer, distilled spirits manufacturer, brandy manufacturer, or rectifier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 695, Sec. 6.   (SB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25174.

The department may seize any distilled spirits sold, served, removed, possessed, delivered, or held in any manner in violation of Sections 25170 to 25173, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25175.

Any person who sells at retail any potable spirituous liquor product labeled as whiskey, including blended whiskey and blends of straight whiskeys, except products containing 20 or more percent of straight whiskey or whiskeys which have been aged in charred oak containers for three or more years after distillation and before bottling is guilty of a misdemeanor, except that this section does not prohibit the sale at retail of unaged corn whiskey, when so labeled, or the sale at retail of gins, brandies, rums, cordials, liqueurs, bitters, or other distilled liquor products, or products compounded of distilled spirits and other materials, when in no wise labeled as whiskey or blended whiskey or blends of straight whiskeys, or the sale at retail of Scotch whiskeys, or spirit whiskeys containing not less than 5 percent straight whiskey, three years old or older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 921, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25176.

Every person who refills or causes to be refilled with distilled spirits any distilled spirits container is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 68, Sec. 2.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25177.

Every person who sells, offers for sale, or keeps for sale distilled spirits in any package which has been refilled or partly refilled is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25178.

No on-sale general licensee or any person employed by such licensee shall sell, offer for sale, or keep for sale an empty distilled spirits bottle. No criminal penalty shall be imposed for a violation of this section. For such a violation the department may impose a monetary penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or suspend or revoke a license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

25179.

(a) Only agave spirits produced entirely from agaves grown within California, without flavoring or coloring additives, may be labeled with the words “California agave spirits” or any combination of the words “California agave spirits,” “California agave,” or a substantially similar description. This section does not preclude the use of the word “California” to describe the location of a distillery.

(b) The department may seize agave spirits labeled in violation of this section, regardless of where they are found, and may dispose of the spirits pursuant to Section 25355.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 694, Sec. 1.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Beer [25200. - 25206.]

25200.

(a) A package or sealed container of beer shall not be sold in this state without having a label affixed to such package or container. The label shall meet the requirements of federal malt beverage labeling regulations contained in Parts 7 and 16 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, regardless of whether the label is subject to approval by the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau or any successor agency.

(b) (1) In addition to label requirements pursuant to subdivision (a), if not already included, the following information shall
 appear on the label:

(A) The brand, and class or type, of beer.

(B) The true and correct name and address of the manufacturer of the beer. For purposes of this provision, if multiple beer manufacturers are involved in the production of the beer pursuant to a joint venture
 or other collaborative arrangement, each of those manufacturers may be identified on the label.

(C) The true and correct name of the bottler of the beer, if other than the manufacturer.

(D) A statement of alcoholic content if the beer contains more than 5.7 percent alcohol by
 volume.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the true and correct name of a manufacturer, bottler, or packager shall be deemed to include a fictitious business name for which the manufacturer, bottler, or packager has duly filed a fictitious business name statement pursuant to Section 17900.

(c) Prior to the first sale of a brand of beer in this state, the manufacturer of that beer shall register the
 brand with the department. Upon the filing of the registration with the department, the brand may be sold in this state without further action by the department. The registration shall include the following:

(1) The true name and address of the actual manufacturer of the beer.

(2) Any fictitious business name of the manufacturer under which the beer is manufactured.

(3) The class or type of beer and all brand names under which the beer is to be sold in this state.

(4) If manufactured under contract for another beer manufacturer
 or other person, the true name of such other beer manufacturer or person.

(5) If manufactured pursuant to a joint venture or other collaborative arrangement, the name and address of all manufacturers involved in the joint venture or other collaborative arrangement.

(d) The manufacturer of the beer shall be responsible for compliance with the requirements of this section. In the case of beer manufactured pursuant to a joint venture or other
 collaborative arrangement, only the actual manufacturer of the beer need comply.

(e) If beer is sold or offered for sale in this state without first complying with the provisions of this section, or violates any other provision of this division, the department may take such action as it deems reasonable and necessary, including, but not limited to, ordering that the beer no longer be sold or offered for sale until such time as the requirements of this section are complied with. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the department from permitting beer that is sold or offered for sale in this state that does not comply with the requirements of this section to continue to be sold or offered for sale for a reasonable period of time to allow the manufacturer to meet the requirements of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (AB 893)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25201.

(a) A manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler of beer shall not use a container or carton as a package or container of a beer other than the beer as is manufactured by the manufacturer whose name or brand of beer appears upon the container or carton, or use as a package or container of a beer a container or carton which bears the name of a manufacturer of beer or the brand of any beer other than those of the manufacturer of the beer contained in the container or carton.

(b) A beer manufacturer that refills any container supplied by a consumer shall affix a label that complies with this section on the container prior to its resale to the consumer. Any information concerning
 any beer previously packaged in the container, including, but not limited to, information regarding the manufacturer and bottler of the beer, or any associated brands or trademarks, shall be removed or completely obscured in a manner not readily removable by the consumer prior to the resale of the container to the consumer. This subdivision does not authorize a beer manufacturer to refill a container supplied by a consumer with a capacity of five liquid gallons or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 410, Sec. 3.   (AB 893)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25202.

(a) Manufacturers’ names, brand names, print, or markings first placed on returnable beer containers, metal kegs, or cartons made of wood or fiber board shall not be obliterated, mutilated, or marked out without the written consent of the manufacturer whose name, brand, or printed markings is to be obliterated, mutilated, or marked out.

(b) This section does not apply to metal kegs or wood or fiber board containers or cartons of a beer manufacturer who has discontinued business and production and is no longer a licensed beer manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   (AB 2203)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25203.

Every manufacturer or bottler of beer in this State or elsewhere whose beer is sold within the State shall file with the department the brand name or names under which he sells or labels his draught beer sold in the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25205.

(a) Any container of beer or alcoholic beverage, other than sake, that is approved for labeling as a malt beverage under the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.), that derives 0.5 percent or more of its alcoholic content by volume from flavors or other ingredients containing distilled alcohol and that is sold by a manufacturer or importer to a wholesaler or retailer within this state on or after July 1, 2009, shall bear a distinctive, conspicuous, and prominently displayed label, or firmly affixed sticker, containing the following information:

(1) The percentage alcohol content of the beverage by volume.

(2) The phrase “CONTAINS ALCOHOL” in bold capitalized letters at least three millimeters in height and that is distinguishable from the background and placed conspicuously in either horizontal or vertical lettering on the front of the brand label. A firmly affixed sticker need not be placed on the brand label provided it is placed on the front of the container.

(b) The department may require licensees to submit information as it determines to be necessary, and may adopt regulations as may be required, to implement and enforce this section. The regulations shall be for the limited purpose of ensuring compliance with this section and shall not place additional requirements on the label or sticker required by this section. Any information required to be provided by any licensee to the
 department pursuant to this section shall be considered confidential and corporate proprietary information. This information shall not be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) It is the exclusive purpose of this section to identify and specially label products described in subdivision (a) and not to classify these specially labeled products. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the classification of any product in a manner that is inconsistent with the definitions of beer, wine, and distilled spirits set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 23000) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 38.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

25206.

No retailer shall dispense any draught beer upon which the proper tap sign or draught beer sign is not displayed or the manufacturer or bottler of which has not complied with this article. The department may seize any draught beer displayed to the public in violation of this section and may dispose of the beer pursuant to Section 25355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Wine [25235. - 25248.]

25235.

It is unlawful for any person to sell to any on- or off-sale licensee or to deliver to the premises of any on- or off-sale licensee, or for any on- or off-sale licensee to sell or to have upon his or her licensed premises, wine packaged or bottled in any pocket flask container of less than 750 milliliters, the face of which is substantially rectangular and the minimum thickness of which is less than two-thirds of its maximum width, the measurements to be made on the cross-sectional axes, excluding the neck portion of the container. This section does not apply to the possession of wine in such containers on the premises of a licensed wine grower or at the branch office or warehouse or United States bonded storeroom of the wine grower located away from his place of production or manufacture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25236.

Only dry wine produced entirely from grapes grown within the Counties of Sonoma, Napa, Mendocino, Lake, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Alameda, San Benito, Solano, San Luis Obispo, Contra Costa, Monterey, and Marin may be labeled with the words “California central coast counties dry wine.” It is unlawful to label any other wine with a label containing the words “California central coast counties dry wine.”

The department may seize wine labeled in violation of this section, regardless of where found and may dispose of the wine pursuant to Section 25355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 135, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25237.
